woods_cree/woods-cree-analyzer.xfst
read regex @"analyser-gt-desc.hfst";
define PlainsCreeAnalyzer ;

define LongISpellingRule ī (->) e ;
define ThToYahRule t h -> y ;
define LongIBehoreH i (->) ī || _ h .o. ī (->) i || _ h ;
define LongABehoreH a (->) ā || _ h .o. ā (->) a || _ h ;
define LongOBehoreH o (->) ō || _ h .o. ō (->) o || _ h ;
define LongOBehoreW o (->) ō || _ w ;
define IBehoreY     i (->) e || _ y ;
define LongIBehoreY ī (->) i || _ y ;

define Transformation [ ThToYahRule       .o.
			LongOBehoreW      .o.
			IBehoreY          .o.
			LongIBehoreY      .o.	
			LongABehoreH      .o.
			LongIBehoreH      .o.	
			LongOBehoreH      .o.
			LongISpellingRule ] ;


read regex Transformation .o. PlainsCreeAnalyzer ;

save stack woods-cree-analyzer.hfst
